California statutes. Financial Code
(b) No licensee shall place an advertisement disseminated primarily in this state for a deferred deposit transaction unless the licensee discloses in the printed text of the advertisement, or the oral text in the case of a radio or television advertisement, that the licensee is licensed by the department pursuant to this division.

(c) The commissioner may require that rates of charges or fees, if stated by the licensee, be stated fully and clearly in the manner that the commissioner deems necessary to give adequate information to, or to prevent misunderstanding by, prospective customers.

(d) No advertising copy shall be used after its use has been disapproved by the commissioner and the licensee is notified in writing of the disapproval.

(e) The commissioner may require licensees to maintain a file of all advertising copy for a period of 90 days from the date of its use. The file shall be available to the commissioner upon request.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 777, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2003.   Section operative on December 31, 2004, or sooner, pursuant to Section 23104.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Deferred Deposit Transactions [23035. - 23038.]

23035.

(a) A licensee may defer the deposit of a customer’s personal check for up to 31 days, pursuant to the provisions of this section. The face amount of the check shall not exceed three hundred dollars ($300). Each deferred deposit transaction shall be made pursuant to a written agreement as described in subdivision (e) that has been signed by the customer and by the licensee or an authorized representative of the licensee.

(b) A customer who enters into
 a deferred deposit transaction and offers a personal check to a licensee pursuant to an agreement shall not be subject to any criminal penalty for the failure to comply with the terms of that agreement.

(c) Before entering into a deferred deposit transaction, licensees shall distribute to customers a notice that shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

(1) Information about charges for deferred deposit transactions.

(2) That if the customer’s check is returned unpaid, the customer may be charged an additional fee of up to fifteen dollars ($15).

(3) That the customer cannot be prosecuted in a criminal action in conjunction with a deferred deposit transaction for a returned check or be threatened with prosecution.

(4) The department’s toll-free telephone number for receiving calls regarding customer complaints and concerns.

(5) That the licensee may not accept any collateral in conjunction with a deferred deposit transaction.

(6) That the check is being negotiated as part of a deferred deposit transaction made pursuant to Section 23035 of the Financial Code and is not subject to the provisions of Section 1719 of the Civil Code. No customer may be required to pay treble damages if this check does not clear.

(d) The following notices shall be clearly and conspicuously posted in the unobstructed view of the public by all licensees in each location of a business providing deferred deposit transactions in letters not less than one-half inch in height:

(1) The licensee cannot use the criminal process against a consumer to collect any deferred deposit transaction.

(2) The schedule of all charges and fees to be charged on those deferred deposit transactions with an example of all charges and fees that would be charged on at least a one-hundred-dollar ($100) and a two-hundred-dollar ($200) deferred deposit transaction, payable in 14 days and 30 days, respectively, giving the corresponding annual percentage rate. The information may be provided in a chart as follows:Amount
 Provided
Fee

Amount of Check

14-day APR

30-day APR

$100XXXXXXXXXXX
$200XXXXXXXXXXX(e) An agreement to enter into a deferred deposit transaction shall be in writing and shall be provided by the
 licensee to the customer. The written agreement shall authorize the licensee to defer deposit of the personal check, shall be signed by the customer, and shall include all of the following:

(1) A full disclosure of the total amount of any fees charged for the deferred deposit transaction, expressed both in United States currency and as an APR as required under the Federal Truth In Lending Act and its regulations.

(2) A clear description of the customer’s payment obligations as required under the Federal Truth In Lending Act and its regulations.

(3) The name, address, and telephone number of the licensee.

(4) The customer’s name and address.

(5) The date to which deposit of check has been
 deferred (due date).

(6) The payment plan, or extension, if applicable as allowed under subdivision (c) of Section 23036.

(7) An itemization of the amount financed as required under the Federal Truth In Lending Act and its regulations.

(8) Disclosure of any returned check charges.

(9) That the customer cannot be prosecuted or threatened with prosecution to collect.

(10) That the licensee cannot accept collateral in connection with the transaction.

(11) That the licensee cannot make a deferred deposit transaction contingent on the purchase of another product or service.

(12) Signature space for the customer and signature of the licensee or authorized representative of the licensee and date of the transaction.

(13) Any other information that the commissioner shall deem necessary by regulation.

(f) The notice required by subdivision (c) shall be written and available in the same language principally used in any oral discussions or negotiations leading to execution of the deferred deposit agreement and shall be in at least 10-point type.

(g) The written agreement required by subdivision (e) shall be written in the same language principally used in any oral discussions or negotiations leading to execution of the deferred deposit agreement; shall not be vague, unclear, or misleading and shall be in at least 10-point type.

(h) Under no circumstances shall a deferred deposit transaction agreement include any of the following:

(1) A hold harmless clause.

(2) A confession of judgment clause or power of attorney.

(3) Any assignment of or order for payment of wages or other compensation for services.

(4) Any acceleration provision.

(5) Any unconscionable provision.

(i) If the licensee sells or otherwise transfers the debt at a later date, the licensee shall clearly disclose in a written agreement that any debt or checks held or transferred pursuant to a deferred deposit transaction made pursuant to Section 23035 are not subject to the
 provisions of Section 1719 of the Civil Code and that no customer may be required to pay treble damages if the check or checks are dishonored.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 777, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2003.   Section operative on December 31, 2004, or sooner, pursuant to Section 23104.)
-------------------------------------------

23036.

(a) A fee for a deferred deposit transaction shall not exceed 15 percent of the face amount of the check.

(b) A licensee may allow an extension of time, or a payment plan, for repayment of an existing deferred deposit transaction but may not charge any additional fee or charge of any kind in conjunction with the extension or payment plan. A licensee that complies with the provisions of this subdivision shall not be deemed to be in violation of
 subdivision (g) of Section 23037.

(c) A licensee shall not enter into an agreement for a deferred deposit transaction with a customer during the period of time that an earlier written agreement for a deferred deposit transaction for the same customer is in effect.

(d) A licensee who enters into a deferred deposit transaction agreement, or any assignee of that licensee, shall not be entitled to recover damages for that transaction in any action brought pursuant to, or governed by, Section 1719 of the Civil Code.

(e) A fee not to exceed fifteen dollars ($15) may be charged for the return of a dishonored check by a depositary institution in a deferred deposit transaction. A single fee charged pursuant to this subdivision is the exclusive charge for a dishonored check. No fee may be added for late payment.

(f) No amount in excess of the amounts authorized by this section shall be directly or indirectly charged by a licensee pursuant to a deferred deposit transaction.

(g) A licensee shall be subject to the provisions of Title 1.6C (commencing with Section 1788) of Part 4 of Division 3 of the Civil Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 777, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2003.   Section operative on December 31, 2004, or sooner, pursuant to Section 23104.)
-------------------------------------------

23037.

In no case shall a licensee do any of the following:

(a) Accept or use the same check for a subsequent transaction, or permit a customer to pay off all or a portion of one deferred deposit transaction with the proceeds of another.

(b) Accept any collateral for a deferred deposit transaction.

(c) Make any deferred deposit transaction contingent on
 the purchase of insurance or any other goods or services.

(d) Enter into a deferred deposit transaction with a person lacking the capacity to contract.

(e) Alter the date or any other information on a check.

(f) Engage in any unfair, unlawful, or deceptive conduct, or make any statement that is likely to mislead in connection with the business of deferred deposit transactions.

(g) Accept more than one check for a single deferred deposit transaction.

(h) Take any check, instrument, or form in which blanks are left to be filled in after execution.

(i) Offer, arrange, act as an agent for, or assist a deferred deposit originator
 in any way in the making of a deferred deposit transaction unless the deferred deposit originator complies with all applicable federal and state laws and regulations, including the provisions of this division.

(1) The prohibition specified in this subdivision does not apply to the arranger, agent, or assistant to a state or federally chartered bank, thrift, savings association, or industrial loan company where the state or federally chartered bank, thrift, savings association, or industrial loan company satisfies all of the following:

(A) It initially advances the loan proceeds to the customer.

(B) It does not sell, assign, or transfer a preponderant economic interest in the deferred deposit transaction to the arranger, agent, or assistant, or an affiliate or subsidiary of the state or federally chartered bank,
 thrift, savings association, or industrial loan company, unless selling, assigning, or transferring a preponderant economic interest is expressly permitted by the primary regulator of the state or federally chartered bank, thrift, savings association, or industrial loan company.

(C) It develops the deferred deposit transaction product or products on its own.

(2) If a licensee offers, arranges, acts as an agent for, or assists a state or federally chartered bank, thrift, savings association, or industrial loan company in any way in the making of a deferred deposit transaction and the state or federally chartered bank, thrift, savings association, or industrial loan company meets the standards set forth in paragraph (1), the licensee shall comply with all other provisions in this division to the extent they are not preempted by other state and federal laws.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 777, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2003.   Section operative on December 31, 2004, or sooner, pursuant to Section 23104.)
-------------------------------------------

23038.

(a) Any person who violates any provision of Section 987 of Title 10 of the United States Code, as amended by 126 Stat. 1785 (Public Law 112-239), or any provision of Part 232 (commencing with Section 232.1) of Subchapter M of Chapter I of Subtitle A of Title 32 of the Code of Federal Regulations, as published on July 22, 2015, on page 43560 in Number 140 of Volume 80 of the Federal Register, violates this division.

(b) A person that does not market deferred deposit transactions to, or does not enter into those transactions with, covered borrowers, as that term is defined under Part 232 (commencing with Section 232.1) of Subchapter M of Chapter I of Subtitle A of Title 32 of the Code of Federal Regulations, as amended on the date described in subdivision (a), shall not be in violation of Section 394 of the Military and Veterans Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 514, Sec. 4.   (SB 266)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Enforcement [23045. - 23106.]



  ARTICLE 1. Administrative Actions [23045. - 23058.]

23045.

(a) Licenses issued under this division remain in effect until they are surrendered, revoked, or suspended.

(b) The surrender of a license becomes effective 30 days after receipt of an application to surrender the license or within a shorter period of time that the commissioner may determine, unless a revocation or suspension proceeding is pending when the application is filed or a proceeding to revoke or suspend or to impose conditions upon the
 surrender is instituted within 30 days after the application is filed. If a proceeding is pending or instituted, the surrender of a license becomes effective at the time and upon the conditions that the commissioner determines.

(c) The power of investigation and examination by the commissioner is not terminated by the surrender, suspension, or revocation of any license issued by the commissioner.

(d) Whenever the commissioner deems it necessary for the general welfare of the public, the commissioner shall have continuous authority to exercise the powers set forth in this division whether or not an application for a license has been filed with the commissioner, any license has been issued, or if issued, has been surrendered, suspended, or revoked.

(e) The commissioner may, upon three days’ notice and a hearing,
 suspend any license for a period not exceeding 30 days, pending investigation, where the commissioner believes that a person subject to this division is conducting business in an unsafe or injurious manner.

(f) Any licensee may surrender any license by delivering to the commissioner written notice that the licensee surrenders that license pursuant to subdivision (b). The surrender of the license does not affect the licensee’s civil or criminal liability for acts committed prior to the surrender of the license.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 777, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2003.   Section operative on December 31, 2004, or sooner, pursuant to Section 23104.)
-------------------------------------------

23046.

(a) For the purpose of discovering violations of this division or securing information required by the commissioner in the administration and enforcement of this division, the commissioner may at any time, but not less than once every two years, investigate the business of deferred deposits, and examine the books, accounts, records, and files used in the business of deferred deposit transactions, of every person engaged in the business of deferred deposit transactions, whether the person acts or claims to act as a
 principal or an agent, or under or without the authority of this division. For the purpose of examination, the commissioner and the commissioner’s representatives shall have free access to the offices and places of business, books, accounts, papers, records, files, safes, and vaults of all these persons.

(b) The cost of each examination of a licensee or a person subject to this division shall be paid to the commissioner by the licensee or person examined, and the commissioner may maintain an action for the recovery of the cost in any court of competent jurisdiction. In determining the cost of an examination, the commissioner may use the estimated average hourly cost for all persons performing examinations of licensees or other persons subject to this division for the fiscal year.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 777, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2003.   Section operative on December 31, 2004, or sooner, pursuant to Section 23104.)
-------------------------------------------

23047.

(a) In making any examination or investigation, the commissioner may, for a reasonable time not to exceed 30 days, take possession of the books, records, accounts, and other papers pertaining to the business. The commissioner may place a keeper in exclusive charge and custody of the books, records, accounts, and other papers in the office or place where they are usually kept. During possession by the keeper, no person shall remove or attempt to remove any of the books, accounts, papers, records, files, safes, and
 vaults, or any part thereof, except in compliance with a court order or written consent of the commissioner.

(b) The officers, employees, partners, directors, and stockholders may inspect and examine the books, accounts, papers, records, files, safes, and vaults while they are in the custody of the commissioner. Employees may make entries in these documents reflecting current operations or transactions.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 777, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2003.   Section operative on December 31, 2004, or sooner, pursuant to Section 23104.)
-------------------------------------------

23048.

(a) The commissioner may require the attendance of witnesses and examine under oath all persons whose testimony the commissioner requires relative to transactions or business regulated by this division or to the subject matter of any examination, investigation, or hearing.

(b) The commissioner may require the production for examination in this state of all books, records, and supporting data used by the licensee in the preparation of reports to the
 commissioner. The books, records, and supporting data shall be made available for examination by the commissioner in this state within 10 days after a written demand.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 777, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2003.   Section operative on December 31, 2004, or sooner, pursuant to Section 23104.)
-------------------------------------------

23049.

After an examination, investigation, or hearing under this division, if the commissioner deems it of public interest or advantage, the commissioner may certify a record to the proper prosecuting official of the city, county, or city and county in which the act complained of, examined, or investigated occurred. The data and records shall be kept confidential pursuant to Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code and any regulations adopted thereunder.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 114.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Sec. 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------

23050.

Whenever, in the opinion of the commissioner, any person is engaged in the business of deferred deposit transactions, as defined in this division, without a license from the commissioner, or any licensee is violating any provision of this division, the commissioner may order that person or licensee to desist and to refrain from engaging in the business or further violating this division. If within 30 days, after the order is served, a written request for a hearing is filed and no hearing is held within 30 days thereafter, the order is
 rescinded.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 777, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2003.   Section operative on December 31, 2004, or sooner, pursuant to Section 23104.)
-------------------------------------------

23051.

(a) Whenever the commissioner believes from evidence satisfactory to the commissioner that any person has violated or is about to violate a provision of this division, or a provision of any order, license, decision, demand, requirement, or any regulation adopted pursuant to this division, the commissioner may, in the commissioner’s discretion, bring an action in the name of the people of the State of California against that person to enjoin that person from continuing that violation or doing any act in furtherance
 of the violation. Upon a proper showing, a permanent or preliminary injunction, restraining order, or writ of mandate shall be granted and other ancillary relief may be granted as appropriate.

(b) If the commissioner determines that it is in the public interest, the commissioner may include in any action authorized by subdivision (a) a claim for ancillary relief, including, but not limited to, a claim for restitution, disgorgement, or damages on behalf of the persons injured by the act or practice constituting the subject matter of the action. The court shall have jurisdiction to award additional relief.

(c) Any person who violates any provision of this division, or who violates any rule or order adopted pursuant to this division, shall be liable for a civil penalty not to exceed two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) for each violation, which shall be assessed and recovered
 in a civil action brought in the name of the people of the State of California by the commissioner in any court of competent jurisdiction.

(d) As applied to the penalties for acts in violation of this division, the remedies provided by this section and by other sections of this division are not exclusive, and may be sought and employed in any combination to enforce the provisions of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 777, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2003.   Section operative on December 31, 2004, or sooner, pursuant to Section 23104.)
-------------------------------------------

23052.

The commissioner may suspend or revoke any license, upon notice and reasonable opportunity to be heard, if the commissioner finds any of the following:

(a) The licensee has failed to comply with any demand, ruling, or requirement of the commissioner made pursuant to and within the authority of this division.

(b) The licensee has violated any provision of this division or any rule or regulation made by the
 commissioner under and within the authority of this division.

(c) A fact or condition exists that, if it had existed at the time of the original application for the license, reasonably would have warranted the commissioner in refusing to issue the license originally.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 777, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2003.   Section operative on December 31, 2004, or sooner, pursuant to Section 23104.)
-------------------------------------------

23053.

The commissioner may by order summarily suspend or revoke the license of any licensee if that person fails to file the report required by Section 23026 within 10 days after notice by the commissioner that the report is due and not filed. If, after an order is made, a request for hearing is filed in writing within 30 days and the hearing is not held within 60 days thereafter, the order is deemed rescinded as of its effective date.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 777, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2003.   Section operative on December 31, 2004, or sooner, pursuant to Section 23104.)
-------------------------------------------

23054.

The revocation, suspension, expiration, or surrender of any license does not impair or affect the obligation of any preexisting lawful contract between the licensee and any borrower.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 777, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2003.   Section operative on December 31, 2004, or sooner, pursuant to Section 23104.)
-------------------------------------------

23055.

The proceedings under this article shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and in all cases the commissioner has all the powers granted therein.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 777, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2003.   Section operative on December 31, 2004, or sooner, pursuant to Section 23104.)
-------------------------------------------

23056.

Every order, decision, license, or other official act of the commissioner is subject to judicial review in accordance with law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 777, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2003.   Section operative on December 31, 2004, or sooner, pursuant to Section 23104.)
-------------------------------------------

23058.

(a) If, upon inspection, examination or investigation, based upon a complaint or otherwise, the department has cause to believe that a person is engaged in the business of deferred deposit transactions without a license, or a licensee or person is violating any provision of this division or any rule or order thereunder, the department may issue a citation to that person in writing, describing with particularity the basis of the citation. Each citation may contain an order to desist and refrain and an assessment of
 an administrative penalty not to exceed two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500). All penalties collected under this section shall be deposited in the State Corporations Fund.

(b) The sanctions authorized under this section shall be separate from, and in addition to, all other administrative, civil, or criminal remedies.

(c) If within 30 days from the receipt of the citation of the person cited fails to notify the department that the person intends to request a hearing as described in subdivision (d), the citation shall be deemed final.

(d) Any hearing under this section shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and in all states the commissioner has all the powers granted therein.

(e) After the exhaustion of the review procedures provided for in this section, the department may apply to the appropriate superior court for a judgment in the amount of the administrative penalty and order compelling the cited person to comply with the order of the department. The application, which shall include a certified copy of the final order of the department, shall constitute a sufficient showing to warrant the issuance of the judgment and order.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 777, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2003.   Section operative on December 31, 2004, or sooner, pursuant to Section 23104.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Penalties for Misconduct [23060. - 23063.]

23060.

(a) If any amount other than, or in excess of, the charges or fees permitted by this division is willfully charged, contracted for, or received, a deferred deposit transaction contract shall be void, and no person shall have any right to collect or receive the principal amount provided in the deferred deposit transaction, any charges, or fees in connection with the transaction.

(b) If any provision of this division is willfully violated in the making
 or collection of a deferred deposit transaction, the deferred deposit transaction contract shall be void, and no person shall have any right to collect or receive any amount provided in the deferred deposit transaction, any charges, or fees in connection with the transaction.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 777, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2003.   Section operative on December 31, 2004, or sooner, pursuant to Section 23104.)
-------------------------------------------

23061.

(a) If any amount other than, or in excess of, the charges permitted by this division is charged, contracted for, or received in connection with a deferred deposit transaction, for any reason other than a willful act of the licensee, the licensee shall forfeit all charges and fees on the deferred deposit transaction and may collect or receive only the principal amount of the transaction.

(b) Subdivision (a) shall not apply to an error in computation
 if (1) the licensee shows by a preponderance of evidence that the violation was not intentional and resulted from a bona fide error, notwithstanding the maintenance of procedures reasonably adapted to avoid that error, and (2) within 60 days of discovering the error the licensee notifies the customer of the error and makes whatever adjustments in the account are necessary to correct the error.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 777, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2003.   Section operative on December 31, 2004, or sooner, pursuant to Section 23104.)
-------------------------------------------

23062.

(a) If any provision of this division is violated in the making or collection of a deferred deposit transaction, for any reason other than a willful act of the licensee, the licensee shall forfeit all charges and fees on the deferred deposit and may collect or receive only the principal amount.

(b) Subdivision (a) shall not apply to a violation if (1) the licensee shows by a preponderance of evidence that the violation was not intentional and
 resulted from a bona fide error notwithstanding the maintenance of procedures reasonably adapted to avoid any such error, and (2) within 30 days of discovering the error the licensee notified the customer of the error and rectified the error by making the appropriate changes in the documents or account and by taking other action necessary to correct the error.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 777, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2003.   Section operative on December 31, 2004, or sooner, pursuant to Section 23104.)
-------------------------------------------

23063.

No provision imposing liability under this division, including the provisions of subdivision (a) of Section 23061 and subdivision (a) of Section 23062, shall apply to any act done or omitted in good faith in conformity with any written general rule, regulation, or specific ruling of the commissioner, notwithstanding that after the act or omission has occurred, the written general rule, regulation, or specific ruling is amended, rescinded, or determined by judicial or other authority to be invalid for any reason.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 777, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2003.   Section operative on December 31, 2004, or sooner, pursuant to Section 23104.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Civil Damages [23064. - 23064.5.]

23064.

Any person who is injured by any violation of this division may bring an action for the recovery of damages, an equity proceeding to restrain and enjoin those violations, or both. The amount awarded may be up to three times the damages actually incurred, but in no event less than the amount paid by the aggrieved consumer to a person subject to this section. If the plaintiff prevails, the plaintiff shall be awarded reasonable attorney’s fees and costs. If a court determines by clear and convincing evidence that a breach or violation was
 willful, the court, in its discretion, may award punitive damages in addition to the amounts set forth above. Upon application, the court may also grant any equitable relief that it deems proper, including, but not limited to, a claim for restitution and disgorgement.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 777, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2003.   Section operative on December 31, 2004, or sooner, pursuant to Section 23104.)
-------------------------------------------

23064.5.

The rights, remedies, and penalties established by this division are cumulative to the rights, remedies, or penalties established under other laws. It is not necessary to exhaust administrative remedies in order to pursue the civil remedies provided for in this act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 777, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2003.   Section operative on December 31, 2004, or sooner, pursuant to Section 23104.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Crimes [23065. - 23065.]

23065.

Any person, including a partner or officer of an entity that is a licensee, who willfully violates any provision of this division or who willfully violates any rule or order adopted pursuant to this division, shall, upon conviction, be punished by a fine of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or by imprisonment in a county jail for not more than one year, or by both that fine and imprisonment. However, no person may be imprisoned for the violation of any rule or order unless he or she had knowledge of the rule or order.
 Conviction under this section shall not preclude the commissioner from exercising the authority in Article 1 (commencing with Section 23045).

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 777, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2003.   Section operative on December 31, 2004, or sooner, pursuant to Section 23104.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Transition Provisions [23070. - 23074.]

23070.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that it is in the public interest for the administration and enforcement of this division to be undertaken by the Department of Financial Protection and Innovation.

(b) It is therefore the intent of the Legislature to transfer the existing responsibilities relating to administration and enforcement of check cashers that engage in activities subject to this division from the Department of Justice to the Department of Financial Protection and Innovation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 452, Sec. 145.   (SB 1498)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

23071.

The Commissioner of Financial Protection and Innovation and the Department of Financial Protection and Innovation shall succeed to, and are vested with, all duties, powers, purposes, responsibilities, and jurisdiction of the Department of Justice as they relate to check cashers who engage in the activities subject to this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 452, Sec. 146.   (SB 1498)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

23072.

The Department of Financial Protection and Innovation may use the unexpended balance of funds available for use in connection with the performance of duties of the Department of Justice to which the Department of Financial Protection and Innovation succeeds pursuant to Section 23071.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 452, Sec. 147.   (SB 1498)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

23073.

All officers and employees of the Department of Justice who, on the operative date of this division, are performing any duty, power, purpose, responsibility, or jurisdiction to which the Department of Financial Protection and Innovation succeeds, and who are serving in the civil service, other than as temporary employees or persons in positions exempted from civil service, shall be transferred to the Department of Financial Protection and Innovation. The status, position, and rights of those persons shall not be affected by the transfer and shall be retained by those persons as officers and employees of the Department of Financial Protection and Innovation, pursuant to Part 2 (commencing with Section 18500) of Division 5 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 452, Sec. 148.   (SB 1498)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

23074.

The Department of Financial Protection and Innovation shall have possession and control of all records, criminal history information, papers, equipment, supplies, moneys, funds, appropriations, licenses, permits, contracts, claims, judgments, land, and other property, real or personal, connected with the administration of, or held for the benefit or use of, the Department of Justice for the performance of the functions transferred to the Department of Financial Protection and Innovation pursuant to Section 23071.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 452, Sec. 149.   (SB 1498)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Miscellaneous [23100. - 23106.]

23100.

(a) Check cashers that hold a valid permit prior to January 1, 2003, issued pursuant to Section 1789.37 of the Civil Code, and that have been making deferred deposits prior to January 1, 2003, shall do the following prior to engaging in the business of deferred deposits on or after December 31, 2004:

(1) Pay the assessment on or before May 15, 2003, pursuant to the provisions of this division for the 2003–04
 fiscal year. The fees and assessments paid pursuant to this subdivision shall be nonrefundable.

(2) On or before May 15, 2003, submit a license application and pay a license fee pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 23005).

(b) Any person that intends to engage in the business of deferred deposits after December 31, 2004, and that holds a check cashing permit from the Attorney General on or before January 2003 and fails to submit a license application or pay a license fee as provided in this subdivision, shall upon the request of the commissioner and applying for a license forfeit to the people of the state a sum of twenty-five dollars ($25) for every day or part of a day that the submission or payment is delayed or withheld. Applications will be processed in the order of the date received by the commissioner. Applications submitted prior to December 31, 2004, shall not
 be subject to subdivision (c) of Section 23011.

(c) The commissioner shall issue a license to a licensee under this division upon receiving payment of the assessment for the 2003–04 fiscal year, the license application, and fee and any additional information the commissioner may require in the application to demonstrate compliance with provisions of this division. The amount collected shall be deposited in the State Corporations Fund and shall be subject to appropriation by the Legislature for the 2003–04 fiscal year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 17, Sec. 16.   Effective February 23, 2004.   Provisions of this section are operative (no later than Dec. 31, 2004) as prescribed in Section 23104 and by Stats. 2004, Ch. 17, Sec. 20.)
-------------------------------------------

23101.

Regulations of the commissioner adopted prior to June 30, 2003, to implement this division shall be adopted as emergency regulations. Upon receipt of the regulations, the Office of Administrative Law shall file the regulations with the Secretary of State for immediate effectiveness.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 777, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2003.   Provisions of this section are operative (no later than Dec. 31, 2004) as prescribed in Section 23104.)
-------------------------------------------

23102.

The deferred deposits made pursuant to a permit issued under Section 1789.37 of the Civil Code prior to December 31, 2004, shall be subject to and enforced to the extent valid under Sections 1789.30 to 1789.37, inclusive, of the Civil Code, as if those sections were not repealed. Any regulation, order, or other action adopted, prescribed, taken, or performed by the Department of Justice or by an officer of that department in connection with deferred deposit transactions made prior to December 31, 2004, shall continue to apply to those transactions. No suit, action, or other proceeding lawfully commenced by or against the Department of Justice or any other officer of the state in relation to deferred deposit transactions made prior to December 31, 2004, shall abate by reason of the transfer of authority concerning deferred deposit transactions to the
 Department of Financial Protection and Innovation pursuant to Section 23071.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 452, Sec. 150.   (SB 1498)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

23103.
